Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.080

Bond not required of state.

No bond shall be required of the state of Washington for any purpose in any case in any of the courts of the state of Washington and the state of Washington shall be, on proper showing, entitled to any orders, injunctions and writs of whatever nature without bond notwithstanding the provisions of any existing statute requiring that bonds be furnished by private parties.

[ 1935 c 122 s 1; RRS s 390-3.]